Washington statutes.
RCW 18.100.118

Eligibility of certain representatives and transferees to serve as directors, officers, or shareholders.

If all of the outstanding shares of a professional corporation are held by an administrator, executor, guardian, conservator, or receiver of the estate of a former shareholder, or by a transferee who received such shares by operation of law or court decree, such administrator, executor, guardian, conservator, receiver, or transferee for a period of twelve months following receipt or transfer of such shares may be a director, officer, or shareholder of the professional corporation.

[ 1983 c 51 s 11.]